Nevada, session 83, AB125.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 232.2175 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
232.2175 1. The Department shall establish and maintain a
location on the official website of the State for the posting of notices
by public bodies as required pursuant to NRS 241.020. The location
must be identified on the official website of the State in a clear and
conspicuous manner.
2. The location established pursuant to subsection 1 must
include [a] :
(a) A place to post a schedule of meetings of public bodies that,
without limitation, provides notice to the public of a meeting of a
public body at least 3 working days before the meeting.
(b) A place for the posting of electronic links to the Internet
website or any electronic mail addresses, if available, of each public
body which has posted a notice pursuant to NRS 241.020, from
which a person may request the information and supporting
materials that a public body must provide to a requester pursuant to
NRS 241.020.
3. The Department shall provide for:
(a) The transmission to the Department by public bodies of:
(1) Notices required pursuant to NRS 241.020; [and]
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(2) Schedules of meetings of public bodies; and
(3) The Internet website or any electronic mail addresses, if
available, of a public body that has submitted a notice for posting on
the official website of the State.
(b) The timely and efficient posting of such notices , schedules
and electronic links to addresses on the official website of Nevada.
4. The Department may adopt regulations to carry out the
provisions of this section.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)